Utah statutes.
17B-2a-812.   Comptroller required to provide statement of revenues and expenditures.

The comptroller of each public transit district shall, as soon as possible after the close of each fiscal year:

(1)  prepare a statement of revenues and expenditures for the fiscal year just ended, in the detail that the board of trustees prescribes; and

(2)  transmit a copy of the statement to the chief executive officer of:

(a)  each municipality within the district; and

(b)  each county with unincorporated area within the district.

